Washington statutes.
RCW 43.280.060

Awarding of grants.

(1) Subject to funds appropriated by the legislature, the department of commerce shall make awards under the grant program established by RCW 43.280.020.

(2) Activities funded under this section may be considered for funding in future years, but shall be considered under the same terms and criteria as new activities. Funding under this chapter shall not constitute an obligation by the state of Washington to provide ongoing funding.

[ 2012 c 29 s 5; 1996 c 123 s 5; 1995 c 399 s 114; 1990 c 3 s 1207.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1996 c 123: See note following RCW 43.280.010.